Washington statutes.
RCW 13.34.165

Civil contempt—Grounds—Motion—Penalty—Detention review hearing.

(1) Failure by a party to comply with an order entered under this chapter is civil contempt of court as provided in RCW 7.21.030(2).

(2) A motion for contempt may be made by a parent, juvenile court personnel, or by any public agency, organization, or person having custody of the child under a court order entered pursuant to this chapter.

(3)(a) Subject to (b) of this subsection, whenever the court finds probable cause to believe, based upon consideration of a motion and the information set forth in a supporting declaration, that a child is missing from care, the court may issue an order directing law enforcement to pick up and return the child to department custody.

(b) If the department is notified of the child's whereabouts and authorizes the child's location, the court must withdraw the order directing law enforcement to pick up and return the child to department custody.

(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the court's inherent contempt power or curtail its exercise.

[ 2019 c 312 s 12; 2019 c 312 s 11; 2000 c 122 s 21; 1998 c 296 s 38; 1996 c 133 s 29; 1989 c 373 s 17; 1985 c 257 s 1]

NOTES:

Effective date—2019 c 312 ss 4, 8, and 12: See note following RCW 7.21.030.

Effective date—Findings—Intent—2019 c 312: See notes following RCW 7.21.080.

Findings—Intent—Part headings not law—Short title—1998 c 296: See notes following RCW 74.13.025.

Findings—Short title—Intent—Construction—1996 c 133: See notes following RCW 13.32A.197.

Severability—1985 c 257: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1985 c 257 s 12.]